Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.530

Review of applications.

The department shall review applications from public or private organizations for state funding of early childhood education and assistance programs. The department shall consider local community needs, demonstrated capacity, and the need to support a mixed delivery system of early learning that includes alternative models for delivery including licensed centers, outdoor nature-based child care providers, and licensed family child care providers when reviewing applications.

[ 2021 c 304 s 20; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 10; 2013 c 323 s 7; 1994 c 166 s 8; 1988 c 174 s 7; 1985 c 418 s 7. Formerly RCW 43.215.430, 28A.215.160, 28A.34A.070.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.216.085.

Effective date—1994 c 166: See note following RCW 43.216.500.

Findings—1994 c 166; 1988 c 174: See note following RCW 43.216.505.